Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; INNOVATION HUB.new text end new text begin $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of Shakopee to design, construct, furnish, and equip the Innovation Hub, which will serve as a regional workforce training and entrepreneur incubator facility. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end